Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3822
Corporation; supervision, rehabilitation, conservation, dissolution, or liquidation.

Any supervision, rehabilitation, conservation, dissolution, or liquidation of a corporation organized under sections 44-3801 to 44-3826 shall be conducted pursuant to the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 22;

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 78.

Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.